Hawaii statutes.
[§668A-7] Determination of value. (a)
Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c), if the court
determines that the property that is the subject of the action for partition is
heirs property, the court shall determine the fair market value of the property
by ordering an appraisal pursuant to subsection (d).

(b) If all cotenants have agreed to the value
of the property or to another method of valuation, the court shall adopt that
value or the value produced by the agreed method of valuation.

(c) If the court determines that the
evidentiary value of an appraisal is outweighed by the cost of the appraisal,
the court, after an evidentiary hearing, shall determine the fair market value
of the property and the special master shall send notice to the parties of the
value.

(d) If the court orders an appraisal, the
court shall appoint a disinterested real estate appraiser licensed in this
State to determine the fair market value of the property assuming sole
ownership of the fee simple estate. On completion of the appraisal, the
appraiser shall file a sworn or verified appraisal with the clerk of the
court. The appraiser shall mail or deliver to the court a file-marked copy of
the appraisal filed with the clerk of the court.

(e) If an appraisal is conducted pursuant to
subsection (d), not later than ten days after the appraisal is filed, the
special master shall send notice to each party with a known address, stating:

(1) The appraised fair market value of the property
as set forth in the appraisal that was filed with the clerk of the court;

(2) That the appraisal is available at the office of
the clerk of the court; and

(3) That a party may object to the appraisal not
later than thirty days after the notice is sent, stating the grounds for the
objection.

(f) If an appraisal is filed with the court
pursuant to subsection (d), the court shall conduct a hearing to determine the
fair market value of the property not earlier than thirty days after a copy of
the notice of appraisal is sent to each party under subsection (e), regardless
of whether an objection to the appraisal is filed under subsection (e)(3). In
addition to the court-ordered appraisal, the court may consider any other
evidence of value that is offered by a party.

(g) Before considering the merits of the
action for partition, the court shall determine the fair market value of the
property and the special master shall send notice to the parties of the value. [L
2016, c 260, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next